Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-119
Depreciable tangible personal property, defined.

Depreciable tangible personal property shall mean tangible personal property which is used in a trade or business or used for the production of income and which has a determinable life of longer than one year.

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 48;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 204.